District of Columbia statutes.
26-111

Utility bill payments services.

(a)

Any financial institution that offers utility bill payment services in the District of Columbia shall not charge any consumer a fee for processing a utility bill payment. The requirements of this section shall apply to any financial institution whose deposits or shares are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation, or the National Credit Union Share Insurance Fund.

(b)

Any person who violates this section shall be subject to a civil fine of not more than $1,000.

History

Mar. 9, 1988, D.C. Law 7-85, § 2, 34 DCR 8124

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-111.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of § 26-112 1981 Ed., see § 12 of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-222, December 23, 1997, 44 DCR 114) and § 13 of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-309, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1923).

References in Text

The “Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation”, referred to in (a), has been abolished. For provisions relating to the abolition of the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation and the transfer of functions, personnel and property of that agency, see §§ 401 to 406 of Pub. L. 101-73, set out as a note under 12 U.S.C. § 1437.